Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB795.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1605(a) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1605. Courses of Study.--(a) In all public, private or parochial schools, there shall be integrated in the social studies curriculum courses of study as provided in this act. It shall be the duty of the superintendent having supervision over any high school to prepare, and recommend to the board of school directors maintaining the same, suitable courses of study, which shall be adopted by said board of school directors, with such changes as they may deem wise, subject to the provisions of this 1234567891011121314151617181920 act. During grades seven through twelve inclusive, there shall be included at least four semesters or equivalent study in the history and government of that portion of America which has become the United States of America, and of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, of such nature, kind or quality, as to have for its purpose the developing, teaching and presentation of the principles and ideals of the American republican representative form of government, as portrayed and experienced by the acts and policies of the framers of the Declaration of Independence and framers of the Constitution of the United States and the Bill of Rights. The study of the history of the United States, including the study of the Constitution of the United States and the study of the history and Constitution of this Commonwealth, shall also be such as will emphasize the good, worthwhile and best features and points of the social, economic and cultural development, the growth of the American family life, high standard of living of the United States citizen, the privileges enjoyed by such citizens, their heritage and its derivations of and in our principles of government. Such instruction shall have for its purpose also the instilling into every boy and girl who comes out of our public, private and parochial schools their solemn duty and obligation to exercise intelligently their voting privilege and to understand the advantages of the American republican form of government as compared with various other forms of government. Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, and continuing each school year thereafter, the instruction under this subsection shall include instruction on the following topics, including Mao Zedong and the Cultural Revolution, Joseph Stalin and the Soviet system, Fidel Castro and the Cuban Revolution, Vladimir Lenin and the Russian Revolution, Pol Pot 20250HB0795PN0819 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and the Khmer Rouge and Nicolas Maduro and the Chavismo movement and how victims suffered under each of the aforementioned regimes through poverty, starvation, migration, systemic lethal violence and suppression of speech.(a.1) No later than April 1, 2026, the State Board of Education shall promulgate regulations consistent with subsection (a).* * *Section 2. All regulations and parts of regulations are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with this act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0795PN0819 - 3 - 1234567891011